New Jersey, session 221, S596.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A public utility shall, upon arriving at a rate settlement agreement, the approval of which would increase individual rates, tolls, charges, or schedules of a public utility, notify customers in the service area affected by the settlement by direct mail prior to the final settlement decision before the Board of Public Utilities.  The notification shall provide an explanation of the proposed settlement, including a detailed justification of the basis for the proposed settlement. b.    For the purposes of this section, public utility means a public utility as defined in R.S.48:2-13, providing gas, electric, water, or sewer service. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.